New York, session 2025-2026, A6849.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 112 of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. (a) The commissioner shall establish a third-party secure vendor 4 mail program to be utilized for the delivery of all non-privileged 5 correspondence to incarcerated individuals including but not limited to, 6 the order and delivery of all products to incarcerated individuals 7 housed at correctional facilities. 8 (b) The commissioner shall provide data on contraband confiscated 9 through the third-party secure vendor mail program to the legislature by 10 December thirty-first each year. 11 (c) The commissioner may promulgate any rules and regulations neces- 12 sary to implement the provisions of this subdivision. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08903-01-5